New Jersey, session 222, S3936.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  An officer, agent, or employee of a hotel, or retreat lodging facility shall verify a guests valid government-issued identification upon the guests check-in, for the purpose of verifying the identity of the guest, by physically checking or scanning the guests government-issued identification card.  Valid government-issued identification shall include, but is not limited to, a valid drivers license, passport, identification card, or REAL ID, or similar identification issued by a governmental entity. b.  A hotel or retreat lodging facility shall maintain a register in which the names and residences, the date of arrival and departure of the guests, and the room or rooms occupied by the guests shall be entered.  A record contained in the register shall be maintained, and shall not be disposed of for at least one year following the guests departure. 2.  a.  An officer, agent, or employee of a rooming or boarding house shall verify a residents valid government-issued identification upon the residents check-in, for the purpose of verifying the identity of the resident, by physically checking or scanning the residents government-issued identification card.  Valid government-issued identification shall include, but is not limited to, a valid drivers license, passport, identification card, or REAL ID, or similar identification issued by a governmental entity. b.  A rooming or boarding house shall maintain a register in which the names and residences, the date of arrival and departure of the residents, and the room or rooms occupied by the residents shall be entered.  A record contained in the register shall be maintained, and shall not be disposed of for at least one year following the residents departure. 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month next following enactment.